Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.060

Appointment and authority of assistants.

The attorney general may appoint necessary assistants who shall have the power to perform any act which the attorney general is authorized by law to perform. Subject to any collective bargaining agreement, assistants shall hold office at the attorney general's pleasure.

[ 2019 c 145 s 6; 2009 c 549 s 5049; 1965 c 8 s 43.10.060. Prior: 1929 c 92 s 7, part; RRS s 11034-1, part.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2019 c 145: See note following RCW 41.80.400.